lj4/app/php/bin/hyph/hyph_la_VA.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 1
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 1
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
.ab1
.a3b2sid
.a3b2síd
.ab2s.
.ab2s1c
.ab2s1q
.ab2s1t
.ab3s2cin
.ab3s2ciss
.ab3s2cín
.ab3s2císs
.ab4s3cissio
.ab4s3cissió
.ab4s3cissío
.ab4s3císsio
.ad1
.ante1i
.ante1o
.ante1pr
.ante1í
.ante1ó
.anté1i
.anté1o
.anté1pr
.circu1i
.circu1í
.circum1
.circun1
.circú1i
.circúm1
.circún1
.co1i
.co1í
.com1ed
.com1es
.com1it
.com1éd
.com1és
.com1ít
.con1
.con2ab
.con2am
.con2an
.con2ar
.con2at
.con2em
.con2entur.
.con2entúr.
.con2er
.con2et
.con2or.
.con2áb
.con2ám
.con2án
.con2ár
.con2át
.con2ém
.con2éntur.
.con2ér
.con2ét
.con2ór.
.círcu1i
.círcum1
.círcun1
.có1i
.cóm1ed
.cóm1es
.cóm1it
.cón1
.cón2ab
.cón2am
.cón2an
.cón2ar
.cón2at
.cón2em
.cón2entur.
.cón2er
.cón2et
.cón2or.
.de1co
.de1có
.de1i
.de1per
.de1pr
.de1pér
.de1re
.de1ré
.de1su
.de1sú
.de1í
.dis1
.dis2cam
.dis2can
.dis2car
.dis2cas.
.dis2cat
.dis2ce.
.dis2ceb
.dis2cem
.dis2cen
.dis2cere
.dis2ceris.
.dis2ceré
.dis2cerís.
.dis2ces.
.dis2cet
.dis2ci.
.dis2cim
.dis2cip
.dis2cis.
.dis2cit
.dis2co.
.dis2cor.
.dis2crib
.dis2crip
.dis2críb
.dis2críp
.dis2cun
.dis2cám
.dis2cán
.dis2cár
.dis2cás.
.dis2cát
.dis2cé.
.dis2céb
.dis2cém
.dis2cén
.dis2cére
.dis2céris.
.dis2cés.
.dis2cét
.dis2cí.
.dis2cím
.dis2cíp
.dis2cís.
.dis2cít
.dis2có.
.dis2cór.
.dis2cún
.dis2pect
.dis2perg
.dis2pers
.dis2pex
.dis2pic
.dis2péct
.dis2pérg
.dis2pérs
.dis2péx
.dis2píc
.dis2ta.
.dis2taba
.dis2tabi
.dis2tabo
.dis2tabunt.
.dis2tabá
.dis2tabí
.dis2tabó
.dis2tabúnt.
.dis2tam
.dis2tan
.dis2tare
.dis2taré
.dis2tas.
.dis2tat
.dis2tem
.dis2ten
.dis2tes.
.dis2tet
.dis2tinct
.dis2ting
.dis2tinx
.dis2tit
.dis2to.
.dis2tá.
.dis2tába
.dis2tábi
.dis2tábo
.dis2tábunt.
.dis2tám
.dis2tán
.dis2táre
.dis2tás.
.dis2tát
.dis2tém
.dis2tén
.dis2tés.
.dis2tét
.dis2tínct
.dis2tíng
.dis2tínx
.dis2tít
.dis2tó.
.dé1co
.dé1i
.dé1per
.dé1pr
.dé1re
.dé1su
.dís1
.dís2cam
.dís2can
.dís2car
.dís2cas.
.dís2cat
.dís2ce.
.dís2ceb
.dís2cem
.dís2cen
.dís2cere
.dís2ceris.
.dís2ces.
.dís2cet
.dís2ci.
.dís2cim
.dís2cip
.dís2cis.
.dís2cit
.dís2co.
.dís2cor.
.dís2crib
.dís2crip
.dís2cun
.dís2pect
.dís2perg
.dís2pers
.dís2pex
.dís2pic
.dís2ta.
.dís2taba
.dís2tabi
.dís2tabo
.dís2tabunt.
.dís2tam
.dís2tan
.dís2tare
.dís2tas.
.dís2tat
.dís2tem
.dís2ten
.dís2tes.
.dís2tet
.dís2tinct
.dís2ting
.dís2tinx
.dís2tit
.dís2to.
.ex1
.ex2peri
.ex2perí
.ex2péri
.in1
.inter1
.inter2am.
.inter2amini.
.inter2aminí.
.inter2amu
.inter2amíni.
.inter2amú
.inter2ant
.inter2ar
.inter2as.
.inter2at
.inter2e.
.inter2eba
.inter2ebá
.inter2emini.
.inter2eminí.
.inter2emu
.inter2emíni.
.inter2emú
.inter2en
.inter2ere
.inter2eris.
.inter2eré
.inter2erís.
.inter2es.
.inter2et
.inter2imini.
.inter2iminí.
.inter2imíni.
.inter2ior
.inter2itor.
.inter2itór.
.inter2ius.
.inter2iór
.inter2iús.
.inter2o.
.inter2or.
.inter2unt
.inter2ám.
.inter2ámini.
.inter2ámu
.inter2ánt
.inter2ár
.inter2ás.
.inter2át
.inter2é.
.inter2éba
.inter2émini.
.inter2ému
.inter2én
.inter2ére
.inter2éris.
.inter2és.
.inter2ét
.inter2ímini.
.inter2íor
.inter2ítor.
.inter2íus.
.inter2ó.
.inter2ór.
.inter2únt
.intro1i
.intro1í
.intró1i
.intér1
.intér2am.
.intér2amini.
.intér2amu
.intér2ant
.intér2ar
.intér2as.
.intér2at
.intér2e.
.intér2eba
.intér2emini.
.intér2emu
.intér2en
.intér2ere
.intér2eris.
.intér2es.
.intér2et
.intér2imini.
.intér2ior
.intér2itor.
.intér2ius.
.intér2o.
.intér2or.
.intér2unt
.ob1
.os1ten
.os1tén
.per1
.per2ic
.per2it
.per2s.
.per2íc
.per2ít
.post1
.post2er
.post2r
.post2ul
.post2ér
.post2úl
.pro1co
.pro1có
.pro1de
.pro1dé
.pro1i
.pro1pr
.pro1su
.pro1sú
.pro1í
.pro2d1act
.pro2d1ea
.pro2d1eg
.pro2d1eo
.pro2d1er
.pro2d1es
.pro2d1eun
.pro2d1eá
.pro2d1eó
.pro2d1eún
.pro2d1ib
.pro2d1iens.
.pro2d1ier
.pro2d1ig
.pro2d1ii
.pro2d1ir
.pro2d1isti
.pro2d1istí
.pro2d1iv
.pro2d1iéns.
.pro2d1iér
.pro2d1ií
.pro2d1áct
.pro2d1éa
.pro2d1ég
.pro2d1éo
.pro2d1ér
.pro2d1és
.pro2d1éun
.pro2d1íb
.pro2d1íens.
.pro2d1íer
.pro2d1íg
.pro2d1íi
.pro2d1ír
.pro2d1ísti
.pro2d1ív
.præ1a
.præ1co
.præ1có
.præ1de
.præ1di
.præ1dé
.præ1dí
.præ1e
.præ1i
.præ1o
.præ1pro
.præ1pró
.præ1su
.præ1super
.præ1supér
.præ1sú
.præ1súper
.præ1á
.præ1é
.præ1í
.præ1ó
.præter1
.præter2am
.præter2ant
.præter2ar
.præter2as.
.præter2at
.præter2e.
.præter2eba
.præter2ebá
.præter2em
.præter2en
.præter2er
.præter2es.
.præter2et
.præter2o
.præter2unt
.præter2ám
.præter2ánt
.præter2ár
.præter2ás.
.præter2át
.præter2é.
.præter2éba
.præter2ém
.præter2én
.præter2ér
.præter2és.
.præter2ét
.præter2ó
.præter2únt
.prætér1
.prætér2am
.prætér2ant
.prætér2ar
.prætér2as.
.prætér2at
.prætér2e.
.prætér2eba
.prætér2em
.prætér2en
.prætér2er
.prætér2es.
.prætér2et
.prætér2o
.prætér2unt
.pró1co
.pró1de
.pró1i
.pró1pr
.pró1su
.pró2d1act
.pró2d1ea
.pró2d1eg
.pró2d1eo
.pró2d1er
.pró2d1es
.pró2d1eun
.pró2d1ib
.pró2d1iens.
.pró2d1ier
.pró2d1ig
.pró2d1ii
.pró2d1ir
.pró2d1isti
.pró2d1iv
.prǽ1a
.prǽ1co
.prǽ1de
.prǽ1di
.prǽ1e
.prǽ1i
.prǽ1o
.prǽ1pro
.prǽ1su
.prǽ1super
.prǽter1
.prǽter2am
.prǽter2ant
.prǽter2ar
.prǽter2as.
.prǽter2at
.prǽter2e.
.prǽter2eba
.prǽter2em
.prǽter2en
.prǽter2er
.prǽter2es.
.prǽter2et
.prǽter2o
.prǽter2unt
.pér1
.pér2ic
.pér2it
.pér2s.
.póst1
.póst2er
.póst2r
.póst2ul
.red1
.red2ic
.red2ix
.red2uc
.red2ux
.red2íc
.red2íx
.red2úc
.red2úx
.réd1
.réd2ic
.réd2ix
.réd2uc
.réd2ux
.sub1
.subter1
.subter2am
.subter2ant
.subter2ar
.subter2as.
.subter2at
.subter2e.
.subter2eba
.subter2ebá
.subter2em
.subter2en
.subter2er
.subter2es.
.subter2et
.subter2i.
.subter2im
.subter2ior
.subter2is.
.subter2it
.subter2ius.
.subter2iór
.subter2iús.
.subter2o
.subter2unt
.subter2ám
.subter2ánt
.subter2ár
.subter2ás.
.subter2át
.subter2é.
.subter2éba
.subter2ém
.subter2én
.subter2ér
.subter2és.
.subter2ét
.subter2í.
.subter2ím
.subter2íor
.subter2ís.
.subter2ít
.subter2íus.
.subter2ó
.subter2únt
.subtér1
.subtér2am
.subtér2ant
.subtér2ar
.subtér2as.
.subtér2at
.subtér2e.
.subtér2eba
.subtér2em
.subtér2en
.subtér2er
.subtér2es.
.subtér2et
.subtér2i.
.subtér2im
.subtér2ior
.subtér2is.
.subtér2it
.subtér2ius.
.subtér2o
.subtér2unt
.super1
.super2a.
.super2aba
.super2aber
.super2abi
.super2abo.
.super2abunt
.super2abá
.super2abér
.super2abí
.super2abó.
.super2abúnt
.super2am.
.super2amini.
.super2aminí.
.super2amu
.super2amíni.
.super2amú
.super2an
.super2ara
.super2are
.super2ari
.super2aro.
.super2arum.
.super2arunt.
.super2ará
.super2aré
.super2arí
.super2aró.
.super2arúm.
.super2arúnt.
.super2as.
.super2asse
.super2assé
.super2asti
.super2astí
.super2at
.super2av
.super2e.
.super2em.
.super2emu
.super2emú
.super2ent
.super2es.
.super2et
.super2i.
.super2ior
.super2is.
.super2ius.
.super2iór
.super2iús.
.super2o.
.super2or.
.super2orum.
.super2orúm.
.super2os.
.super2um.
.super2us.
.super2á.
.super2ába
.super2áber
.super2ábi
.super2ábo.
.super2ábunt
.super2ám.
.super2ámini.
.super2ámu
.super2án
.super2ára
.super2áre
.super2ári
.super2áro.
.super2árum.
.super2árunt.
.super2ás.
.super2ásse
.super2ásti
.super2át
.super2áv
.super2æ.
.super2é.
.super2ém.
.super2ému
.super2ént
.super2és.
.super2ét
.super2í.
.super2íor
.super2ís.
.super2íus.
.super2ó.
.super2ór.
.super2órum.
.super2ós.
.super2úm.
.super2ús.
.super2ǽ.
.supér1
.supér2a.
.supér2aba
.supér2aber
.supér2abi
.supér2abo.
.supér2abunt
.supér2am.
.supér2amini.
.supér2amu
.supér2an
.supér2ara
.supér2are
.supér2ari
.supér2aro.
.supér2arum.
.supér2arunt.
.supér2as.
.supér2asse
.supér2asti
.supér2at
.supér2av
.supér2e.
.supér2em.
.supér2emu
.supér2ent
.supér2es.
.supér2et
.supér2i.
.supér2ior
.supér2is.
.supér2ius.
.supér2o.
.supér2or.
.supér2orum.
.supér2os.
.supér2um.
.supér2us.
.supér2æ.
.sus1
.sus2pect
.sus2pex
.sus2pic
.sus2péct
.sus2péx
.sus2píc
.súb1
.súbter1
.súbter2am
.súbter2ant
.súbter2ar
.súbter2as.
.súbter2at
.súbter2e.
.súbter2eba
.súbter2em
.súbter2en
.súbter2er
.súbter2es.
.súbter2et
.súbter2i.
.súbter2im
.súbter2ior
.súbter2is.
.súbter2it
.súbter2ius.
.súbter2o
.súbter2unt
.súper1
.súper2a.
.súper2aba
.súper2aber
.súper2abi
.súper2abo.
.súper2abunt
.súper2am.
.súper2amini.
.súper2amu
.súper2an
.súper2ara
.súper2are
.súper2ari
.súper2aro.
.súper2arum.
.súper2arunt.
.súper2as.
.súper2asse
.súper2asti
.súper2at
.súper2av
.súper2e.
.súper2em.
.súper2emu
.súper2ent
.súper2es.
.súper2et
.súper2i.
.súper2ior
.súper2is.
.súper2ius.
.súper2o.
.súper2or.
.súper2orum.
.súper2os.
.súper2um.
.súper2us.
.súper2æ.
.sús1
.sús2pect
.sús2pex
.sús2pic
.trans1
.tran1s2cen/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2cri/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2crí/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2cén/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2er/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2il/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2ua/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2ue/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2ui/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2ult/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2um/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2uo/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2ut/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2uu/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2uá/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2ué/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2uí/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2uó/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2uú/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2ér/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2íl/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2úa/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2úe/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2úi/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2últ/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2úm/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2úo/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2út/s=s,5,1
.tran1s2úu/s=s,5,1
.tráns1
.trán1s2cen/s=s,5,1
.trán1s2cri/s=s,5,1
.trán1s2er/s=s,5,1
.trán1s2il/s=s,5,1
.trán1s2ua/s=s,5,1
.trán1s2ue/s=s,5,1
.trán1s2ui/s=s,5,1
.trán1s2ult/s=s,5,1
.trán1s2um/s=s,5,1
.trán1s2uo/s=s,5,1
.trán1s2ut/s=s,5,1
.trán1s2uu/s=s,5,1
.áb1
.á3b2sid
.áb2s.
.áb2s1c
.áb2s1q
.áb2s1t
.áb3s2cin
.áb3s2ciss
.áb4s3cissio
.ád1
.ánte1i
.ánte1o
.ánte1pr
.éx1
.éx2peri
.ín1
.ínter1
.ínter2am.
.ínter2amini.
.ínter2amu
.ínter2ant
.ínter2ar
.ínter2as.
.ínter2at
.ínter2e.
.ínter2eba
.ínter2emini.
.ínter2emu
.ínter2en
.ínter2ere
.ínter2eris.
.ínter2es.
.ínter2et
.ínter2imini.
.ínter2ior
.ínter2itor.
.ínter2ius.
.ínter2o.
.ínter2or.
.ínter2unt
.íntro1i
.ób1
.ós1ten
1ne.
1né.
1que.
1qué.
1qúe.
1ve.
1vé.
d1quam.
d1quám.
d1qúam.
quid1nam.
quid1nám.
quod1nam.
quod1nám.
quíd1nam.
quód1nam.
qúid1nam.
qúod1nam.
s1nam.
s1nám.
s1quam.
s1quám.
s1qúam.
NEXTLEVEL
.a2p1age1
.a1
.a1pa1
.a2p1agé1
.a2p1áge1
.apá1
.alicu2i2.
.ali1
.alicu1
.alicui1
.alicu2í2.
.alicuí1
.aliquo2i2.
.aliqu2
.aliquo1
.aliquoi1
.aliquo2í2.
.aliquoí1
.aliquó2i2.
.aliquó1
.aliquói1
.aliqúo2i2.
.aliqú2
.aliqúo1
.aliqúoi1
.alícu2i2.
.alí1
.alícu1
.alícui1
.alíquo2i2.
.alíqu2
.alíquo1
.alíquoi1
.ce2u2.
.ce1
.ceu1
.ce2ú2.
.ceú1
.cu2i2.
.cu1
.cui1
.cu2í2.
.cuí1
.cé2u2.
.cé1
.céu1
.de2i2n.
.de1
.dei1
.de2ince2p2s.
.dei2n1c
.deince1
.de2incé2p2s.
.deincé1
.de2inde2.
.dei2n1d
.deinde1
.de2indé2.
.deindé1
.de2í2n.
.deí1
.de2ínce2p2s.
.deí2n1c
.deínce1
.de2índe2.
.deí2n1d
.deínde1
.dé2i2n.
.dé1
.déi1
.dé2ince2p2s.
.déi2n1c
.déince1
.dé2inde2.
.déi2n1d
.déinde1
.e2uge2.
.e1
.eu1
.euge1
.e2ugé2.
.eugé1
.e2úge2.
.eú1
.eúge1
.ehe2u2.
.e1he1
.eheu1
.ehe2ú2.
.eheú1
.ehé2u2.
.ehé1
.ehéu1
.gai3ol
.ga1
.gai2o1
.gai1
.gai3ól
.gai2ó1
.gaí3ol
.gaí1
.gaío1
.genu2a2.
.ge1
.genu1
.genua1
.genu2á2.
.genuá1
.gái3ol
.gá1
.gái2o1
.gái1
.génu2a2.
.gé1
.génu1
.génua1
.he2i2c.
.he1
.hei1
.he2u2.
.heu1
.he2u2s.
.he2í2c.
.heí1
.he2ú2.
.heú1
.he2ú2s.
.hu2i2.
.hu1
.hui1
.hu2i2c.
.hu2í2.
.huí1
.hu2í2c.
.hé2i2c.
.hé1
.héi1
.hé2u2.
.héu1
.hé2u2s.
.i2a1
.i1
.i2e1
.i2i1
.i2o1
.i2u1
.i2y1
.i2á1
.i2æ1
.i2é1
.i2í1
.i2ó1
.i2ú1
.i2ý1
.i2ǽ1
.i3en2s.
.ie2n1s
.i3era2m.
.iera1
.i3eramu2s.
.ieramu1
.i3eramú2s.
.ieramú1
.i3eran2t.
.iera2n1t
.i3era2s.
.i3era2t.
.i3erati2s.
.ierati1
.i3eratí2s.
.ieratí1
.i3eri2m.
.i1eri1
.i3erimu2s.
.ierimu1
.i3erimú2s.
.ierimú1
.i3erin2t.
.ieri2n1t
.i3eri2s.
.i3eri2t.
.i3eriti2s.
.ieriti1
.i3erití2s.
.ierití1
.i3ero2.
.iero1
.i3erun2t.
.ieru1
.ieru2n1t
.i3erá2m.
.ierá1
.i3erámu2s.
.ierámu1
.i3erán2t.
.ierá2n1t
.i3erá2s.
.i3erá2t.
.i3eráti2s.
.ieráti1
.i3erí2m.
.ierí1
.i3erímu2s.
.ierímu1
.i3erín2t.
.ierí2n1t
.i3erí2s.
.i3erí2t.
.i3eríti2s.
.ieríti1
.i3eró2.
.ieró1
.i3erún2t.
.ierú1
.ierú2n1t
.i3i2.
.i3imu2s.
.iimu1
.i3imú2s.
.iimú1
.i3isse1
.ii2s1s
.i3issé1
.i3isti2.
.i1i1sti1
.i3isti2s.
.i3istí2.
.iistí1
.i3istí2s.
.i3i2t.
.i3o2.
.i3én2s.
.ié2n1s
.i3éra2m.
.iéra1
.i3éramu2s.
.iéramu1
.i3éran2t.
.iéra2n1t
.i3éra2s.
.i3éra2t.
.i3érati2s.
.iérati1
.i3éri2m.
.i1éri1
.i3érimu2s.
.iérimu1
.i3érin2t.
.iéri2n1t
.i3éri2s.
.i3éri2t.
.i3ériti2s.
.iériti1
.i3éro2.
.iéro1
.i3érun2t.
.iéru1
.iéru2n1t
.i3í2.
.i3ímu2s.
.iímu1
.i3ísse1
.ií2s1s
.i3ísti2.
.i1ísti1
.i3ísti2s.
